Hawaii statutes.
[§486N-2] Exemptions. This chapter
shall not apply to:

(1) Any nonprofit organization;

(2) Any person operating a business primarily for the
purpose of teaching a form of self-defense or dance as an art;

(3) Any private club owned and operated by its
members;

(4) Any medically related service performed by a
doctor legally authorized to practice medicine or osteopathy in the State, in a
private office, clinic, or hospital;

(5) The State or any of its political subdivisions;

(6) Any health club which began offering health club
contracts or any other contracts in the State prior to December 31, 1969; or

(7) Any club whose function as a health club is only
incidental to its overall function and purpose, and whose covered floor space
devoted to the maintenance or development of physical fitness or well-being
through physical exercise comprises less than thirty-five per cent of the total
covered floor space of the club available to members. [L 1984, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next